Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska17-962
Gift or devise; approval by city council or village board.

Before any gift or devise specified in section 17-961 may be accepted, the same shall be approved by the city council or village board.

Laws 1945, c. 31, § 2, p. 149;

Laws 1992, LB 1240, § 15.